Nevada, session 83, SB422.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 293.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.560 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951, 293.502, 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, 293D.230
and 293D.300:
(a) For a primary election, presidential preference primary
election or general election, or a recall or special election that is held
on the same day as a primary election, presidential preference
primary election or general election, the last day to register to vote:
(1) By mail is the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the county clerk
or, if open, a county facility designated pursuant to NRS 293.5035,
is the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary election, presidential
preference primary election or general election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671, is the day of the
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election.
(4) By means of automatic voter registration, is the
eighteenth day immediately preceding the primary election,
presidential preference primary election or general election.
(b) If a recall or special election is not held on the same day as a
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election, the last day to register to vote for the recall or special
election by any method of registration is the third Saturday
preceding the recall or special election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, after the deadlines for the close of registration for a
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election set forth in subsection 1, no person may register to vote for
the election.
3. Except for a recall or special election held pursuant to
chapter 306 or 350 of NRS:
(a) The county clerk of each county shall cause a notice signed
by him or her to be published in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the county indicating:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(1) The day and time that each method of registration for the
election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be closed; and
(2) If the county clerk has designated a county facility
pursuant to NRS 293.5035, the location of that facility.
 If no such newspaper is published in the county, the publication
may be made in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
nearest county in this State.
(b) The notice must be published once each week for 4
consecutive weeks next preceding the day that the last method of
registration for the election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be
closed.
4. The offices of the county clerk, a county facility designated
pursuant to NRS 293.5035 and other ex officio registrars may
remain open on the last Friday in October in each even-numbered
year.
5. A county facility designated pursuant to NRS 293.5035 may
be open during the periods described in this section for such hours
of operation as the county clerk may determine, as set forth in
subsection 3 of NRS 293.5035.
Sec. 1.3. NRS 293.57688 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.57688 1. An automatic voter registration agency is
required to electronically transmit the following information of a
person to the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 293.675 using the system established pursuant to
NRS 293.57686:
(a) An electronic facsimile of the signature of the person, if the
automatic voter registration agency is capable of recording, storing
and transmitting to the county clerk an electronic facsimile of the
signature of the person;
(b) The first or given name and the surname of the person;
(c) The address at which the person actually resides as set forth
in NRS 293.486 and, if different, the address at which the person
may receive mail, including, without limitation, a post office box or
general delivery;
(d) The date of birth of the person;
(e) At least one of the following:
(1) The number indicated on the person’s current and valid
driver’s license or identification card issued by the Department of
Motor Vehicles; or
(2) The last four digits of the person’s social security
number; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
(f) A description of the documentation presented to the
automatic voter registration agency that indicates the person is a
citizen of the United States.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5768, the
automatic voter registration agency shall electronically transmit to
the database created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.675 the information described in subsection 1:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), not later than
5 working days after collecting the information; and
(b) [During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the fifth Sunday
preceding an election, not] Not later than 1 working day after
collecting the information [.] if the information is collected during
the period:
(1) Beginning 2 weeks immediately preceding the
eighteenth day before an election; and
(2) Ending on the eighteenth day before an election.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 293.5842 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5842 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote in person during the period for early
voting, an elector must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place for early
voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as applicable, in
which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 3,] this section,
provide his or her [current] :
(1) Current and valid driver’s license or identification card
issued by [the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or
her physical address] this State, another state, the District of
Columbia or any territory of the United States as proof of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
elector’s identity and , if the driver’s license or identification card
was issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles and shows the
elector’s current residential address, as proof of the elector’s
identity and residency [.] ; or
(2) Tribal identification card as proof of the elector’s
identity and, if the tribal identification card shows the elector’s
current residential address, as proof of the elector’s identity and
residency.
3. If the elector’s driver’s license or identification card was
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles [to the elector] but
does not have the elector’s current residential address, an original,
electronic or certified copy of the following documents may be used
to establish the residency of the elector if the current residential
address of the elector, as indicated on his or her application to
register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service [;] , that is dated not more than 60 days before
the date on which the elector is registering to vote;
(c) A bank or credit union statement [;] that is dated not more
than 60 days before the date on which the elector is registering to
vote;
(d) A paycheck [;] that is dated not more than 60 days before
the date on which the elector is registering to vote;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. [Subject] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or 6,
subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in person
at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot, unless it is
verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to register to vote
and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that polling place.
5. If an elector who appears to vote provides as proof of
identity a driver’s license or identification card that was not issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles or provides a tribal
identification card that does not have the elector’s current
residential address, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes, without limitation:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector; and
(b) A statement informing the elector that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates residency must be provided to the county or city
clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday immediately following
election day and that failure to do so will result in the provisional
ballot not being counted.
6. If an elector who appears to vote does not have a driver’s
license or identification card issued by this State, another state, the
District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector but has not been issued
a driver’s license or identification card by this State, another state,
the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card; and
(b) A statement informing the elector that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates proof of identity and residency must be provided
to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday
immediately following election day and failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an
elector’s provisional ballot that is cast pursuant to this section to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
be counted unless the elector provides proof of identity and
residency as required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 293.5847 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5847 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person on the day of the election at
any polling place in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote on the day of the election, an elector
must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place in the
county or city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 3,] this section,
provide his or her [current] :
(1) Current and valid driver’s license or identification card
issued by [the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or
her physical address] this State, another state, the District of
Columbia or any territory of the United States as proof of the
elector’s identity , and if the driver’s license or identification card
was issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles and shows the
elector’s current residential address, as proof of the elector’s
identity and residency [.] ; or
(2) Tribal identification card as proof of the elector’s
identity and, if the tribal identification card shows the elector’s
current residential address, as proof of the elector’s identity and
residency.
3. If the elector’s driver’s license or identification card was
issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles [to the elector] but
does not have the elector’s current residential address, an original,
electronic or certified copy of the following documents may be used
to establish the residency of the elector if the current residential
address of the elector, as indicated on his or her application to
register to vote, is displayed on the document:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service [;] , that is dated not more than 60 days before
the elector is registering to vote;
(c) A bank or credit union statement [;] that is dated not more
than 60 days before the elector is registering to vote;
(d) A paycheck [;] that is dated not more than 60 days before
the elector is registering to vote;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. [Subject] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 or 6,
subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in person
at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a provisional ballot.
5. If an elector who appears to vote provides as proof of
identity a driver’s license or identification card that was not issued
by the Department of Motor Vehicles or provides a tribal
identification card that does not have the elector’s current
residential address, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes, without limitation:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector; and
(b) A statement informing the elector that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
that demonstrates residency must be provided to the county or city
clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday immediately following
election day and that failure to do so will result in the provisional
ballot not being counted.
6. If an elector who appears to vote does not have a driver’s
license or identification card issued by this State, another state, the
District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card, the elector may cast a provisional ballot
pursuant to subsection 4 if the elector completes a written
affirmation on a form provided by an election officer which
includes:
(a) A statement in which the person affirms under penalty of
perjury that he or she is a qualified elector but has not been issued
a driver’s license or identification card by this State, another state,
the District of Columbia or any territory of the United States or a
tribal identification card; and
(b) A statement informing the elector that a current and valid
driver’s license, identification card or interim document issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles or a tribal identification card
that demonstrates proof of identity and residency must be provided
to the county or city clerk not later than 5 p.m. on the Friday
immediately following election day and failure to do so will result
in the provisional ballot not being counted.
7. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize an
elector’s provisional ballot that is cast pursuant to this section to
be counted unless the elector provides proof of identity and
residency as required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 293C.527 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.527 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.502,
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, 293D.230 and 293D.300:
(a) For a primary city election or general city election, or a recall
or special city election that is held on the same day as a primary city
election or general city election, the last day to register to vote:
(1) By mail is the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary city
election or general city election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the city clerk or, if
open, a municipal facility designated pursuant to NRS 293C.520, is
the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary city election or general
city election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671, is the day of the
primary city election or general city election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(4) By means of automatic voter registration, is the
eighteenth day immediately preceding the primary city election or
general city election.
(b) If a recall or special city election is not held on the same day
as a primary city election or general city election, the last day to
register to vote for the recall or special city election by any method
of registration is the third Saturday preceding the recall or special
city election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, after the deadlines for the close of registration for a
primary city election or general city election set forth in subsection
1, no person may register to vote for the election.
3. Except for a recall or special city election held pursuant to
chapter 306 or 350 of NRS:
(a) The city clerk of each city shall cause a notice signed by him
or her to be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in
the city indicating:
(1) The day and time that each method of registration for the
election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be closed; and
(2) If the city clerk has designated a municipal facility
pursuant to NRS 293C.520, the location of that facility.
 If no newspaper is of general circulation in that city, the
publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation in
the nearest city in this State.
(b) The notice must be published once each week for 4
consecutive weeks next preceding the day on which the last method
of registration for the election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be
closed.
4. A municipal facility designated pursuant to NRS 293C.520
may be open during the periods described in this section for such
hours of operation as the city clerk may determine, as set forth in
subsection 3 of NRS 293C.520.
Sec. 3. NRS 481.057 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.057 [In]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, the Director may arrange for
offices of the Department to remain open on Saturdays and Sundays
and at hours other than 8 a.m. to 5 p.m.
2. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, the
Director shall arrange for the offices of the Department to remain
open on Saturdays and Sundays and at hours other than 8 a.m. to
5 p.m. for a person to apply only for the issuance or renewal of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
any type of driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department:
(a) During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last day to
register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 for a primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election; and
(b) During the 6 calendar days immediately following the day
of a primary election, presidential preference primary election or
general election.
3. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, the
Department shall not require a person to have an appointment for
the issuance or renewal of any type of driver’s license or
identification card issued by the Department:
(a) During the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last day to
register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 for a primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election; and
(b) During the 6 calendar days immediately following the day
of a primary election, presidential preference primary election or
general election.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “General election” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.060.
(b) “Presidential preference primary election” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 293.0771.
(c) “Primary election” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 293.080.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)